Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.030

Licensure or certification required.

(1)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a massage therapist without first applying for and receiving from the department a license to practice. However, this subsection does not prohibit a certified reflexologist from practicing reflexology.

(b) A person represents himself or herself as a massage therapist when the person adopts or uses any title or any description of services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Massage, massage practitioner, massage therapist, massage therapy, therapeutic massage, massage technician, massage technology, massagist, masseur, masseuse, myotherapist or myotherapy, touch therapist, reflexologist except when used by a certified reflexologist, acupressurist, body therapy or body therapist, or any derivation of those terms that implies a massage technique or method.

(2)(a) No person may practice reflexology or represent himself or herself as a reflexologist by use of any title without first being certified as a reflexologist or licensed as a massage therapist by the department.

(b) A person represents himself or herself as a reflexologist when the person adopts or uses any title in any description of services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Reflexologist, reflexology, foot pressure therapy, foot reflex therapy, or any derivation of those terms that implies a reflexology technique or method. However, this subsection does not prohibit a licensed massage therapist from using any of these terms as a description of services.

(c) A person may not use the term "certified reflexologist" without first being certified by the department.

[ 2016 c 41 s 3; 2012 c 137 s 5; 1995 c 198 s 15; 1987 c 443 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.